src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Burmese language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
ပြော V ;
သွား V ;
ဖတ် V ;
ကြိုက် V ;
စား V ;
စီး V ;
ဖက် V ;
လုပ် V ;
ချစ်  V ;
ပေး  V ;
 

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
